Maryland, session 2026, SB0167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
1–403.2.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO INCLUDE A
NOTATION INDICATING VETERAN STATUS ON A LICENSE, PERMIT, REGISTRATION,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0167*

SENATE BILL 167
OR PUBLIC PROFILE.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES A PROCESS UNDER THIS SECTION,
AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE, PERMIT, OR REGISTRATION SHALL ALLOW THE
APPLICANT TO REQUEST THAT A NOTATION OF THE APPLICANT’S VETERAN STATUS
BE INCLUDED ON THE LICENSE, PERMIT, REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE, PERMIT, OR REGISTRATION WHO
REQUESTS THAT A NOTATION OF THE APPLICANT’S VETERAN STATUS BE INCLUDED
ON THE LICENSE, PERMIT, REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) A CERTIFICATION OF VETERAN STATUS OBTAINED FROM
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
9–905 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(II) A FEDERAL CERTIFICATE OF RELEASE OR DISCHARGE
FROM ACTIVE DUTY (DD FORM 214); OR
(III) ANY OTHER DOCUMENTATION CERTIFYING VETERAN
STATUS ACCEPTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) INDICATE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSENTS TO:
(I) HAVING A NOTATION ON THE APPLICANT’S LICENSE,
PERMIT, REGISTRATION, OR PUBLIC PROFILE INDICATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS
A VETERAN; AND
(II) BEING CONTACTED BY APPROPRIATE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
AGENCIES REGARDING THE APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE OR FEDERAL
VETERANS’ BENEFITS.
(D) IF AN APPLICANT SUBMITS THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND CONSENTS TO BEING CONTACTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE A
NOTATION OF VETERAN STATUS ON THE LICENSE, PERMIT, REGISTRATION, OR
PUBLIC PROFILE.
(E) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 4–304 THROUGH 4–325 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, AND ON REQUEST BY AN
EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ELECTRONICALLY
TRANSMIT TO THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY APPROPRIATE INFORMATION

SENATE BILL 167 3
ABOUT EACH LICENSE HOLDER, PERMIT HOLDER, REGISTRANT, OR INDIVIDUAL
WITH A PUBLIC PROFILE WHO HAS CONSENTED TO BEING CONTACTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.